Louisiana, session 2026, HB1019.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The sum of Ten Thousand and No/100 ($10,000.00) Dollars is hereby
payable out of the State General Fund (Direct) for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for payment of the
consent judgment captioned "Shelia Ann Brooks versus Abraham Mebrahtom, Yam
Trucking, LLC, Alpine Transportation Insurance Risk Retention Group, Inc., Dart Transit
Company or AdvantageTransportation, Inc., DBA Dart Advantage Logistics, Joshua Knox,
Kendrix Darnell or Kendrick Rogers, Brown Freightways, Inc., Fedex Ground Package
System, Inc., Samuel Oludayo DBA Samco Trucking, Protective Insurance Company, the
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-2027 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1019
State of Louisiana through the Louisiana Department of Transportation and Development,
City-Parish of Baton Rouge, and the Baton Rouge Police Department", signed on November
19, 2025, between the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and
Development, and Shelia Ann Brooks, bearing number C-719927, Section 26, on the docket
of the Nineteenth Judicial District, parish of East Baton Rouge, state of Louisiana.
Section 2. The judgment may only be paid from this appropriation if it is final and
shall be paid as to principal, interest, court costs, and expert witness fees as awarded in the
judgment. If the provisions of the judgment conflict with the provisions of this Act, the
provisions of the judgment shall be controlling. Any other provision of this Act not in
conflict with the provisions of the judgment shall control. Payment shall be made only after
presentation to the state treasurer of documentation required by the state treasurer. Further,
the judgment shall be deemed to have been paid on the effective date of this Act, and interest
shall cease to run as of that date.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.